test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_tavlu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - laŋkku:
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Nom:  laŋkku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Gen:  laaŋku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Acc:  laaŋku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Ill:  laaŋkun
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Loc:  laaŋkust
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Com:  laŋkkuin
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊŋkuttáá
    laŋkku+N+Ess:  laŋkkun
    laŋkku+N+Par:  laŋkkud
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Nom:  laaŋkuh
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Gen: [laaŋkui, laˊŋkui]
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Acc:  laaŋkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Ill:  laŋkkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Loc:  laaŋkuin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Com:  laˊŋkuiguin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊŋkuittáá

  Noun - tavlu:
    tavlu+N+Sg+Nom:  tavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Gen:  taavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Acc:  taavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Ill:  taavlun
    tavlu+N+Sg+Loc:  taavlust
    tavlu+N+Sg+Com:  tavluin
    tavlu+N+Sg+Abe:  taˊvluttáá
    tavlu+N+Ess:  tavlun
    tavlu+N+Par:  tavlud
    tavlu+N+Pl+Nom:  taavluh
    tavlu+N+Pl+Gen: [taavlui, taˊvlui]
    tavlu+N+Pl+Acc:  taavluid
    tavlu+N+Pl+Ill:  tavluid
    tavlu+N+Pl+Loc:  taavluin
    tavlu+N+Pl+Com:  taˊvluiguin
    tavlu+N+Pl+Abe:  taˊvluittáá

  Noun - lamppu:
    lamppu+N+Sg+Nom:  lamppu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Gen:  laampu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Acc:  laampu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Ill:  laampun
    lamppu+N+Sg+Loc:  laampust
    lamppu+N+Sg+Com:  lamppuin
    lamppu+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊmputtáá
    lamppu+N+Ess:  lamppun
    lamppu+N+Par:  lamppud
    lamppu+N+Pl+Nom:  laampuh
    lamppu+N+Pl+Gen: [laampui, laˊmpui]
    lamppu+N+Pl+Acc:  laampuid
    lamppu+N+Pl+Ill:  lamppuid
    lamppu+N+Pl+Loc:  laampuin
    lamppu+N+Pl+Com:  laˊmpuiguin
    lamppu+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊmpuittáá

  Noun - harppu:
    harppu+N+Sg+Nom:  harppu
    harppu+N+Sg+Gen:  haarpu
    harppu+N+Sg+Acc:  haarpu
    harppu+N+Sg+Ill:  haarpun
    harppu+N+Sg+Loc:  haarpust
    harppu+N+Sg+Com:  harppuin
    harppu+N+Sg+Abe:  haˊrputtáá
    harppu+N+Ess:  harppun
    harppu+N+Par:  harppud
    harppu+N+Pl+Nom:  haarpuh
    harppu+N+Pl+Gen: [haarpui, haˊrpui]
    harppu+N+Pl+Acc:  haarpuid
    harppu+N+Pl+Ill:  harppuid
    harppu+N+Pl+Loc:  haarpuin
    harppu+N+Pl+Com:  haˊrpuiguin
    harppu+N+Pl+Abe:  haˊrpuittáá

  Noun - lanttu:
    lanttu+N+Sg+Nom:  lanttu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Gen:  laantu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Acc:  laantu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Ill:  laantun
    lanttu+N+Sg+Loc:  laantust
    lanttu+N+Sg+Com:  lanttuin
    lanttu+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊntuttáá
    lanttu+N+Ess:  lanttun
    lanttu+N+Par:  lanttud
    lanttu+N+Pl+Nom:  laantuh
    lanttu+N+Pl+Gen: [laantui, laˊntui]
    lanttu+N+Pl+Acc:  laantuid
    lanttu+N+Pl+Ill:  lanttuid
    lanttu+N+Pl+Loc:  laantuin
    lanttu+N+Pl+Com:  laˊntuiguin
    lanttu+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊntuittáá

  Noun - lenccu:
    lenccu+N+Sg+Nom:  lenccu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Gen:  leencu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Acc:  leencu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Ill:  leencun
    lenccu+N+Sg+Loc:  leencust
    lenccu+N+Sg+Com:  lenccuin
    lenccu+N+Sg+Abe:  leˊncuttáá
    lenccu+N+Ess:  lenccun
    lenccu+N+Par:  lenccud
    lenccu+N+Pl+Nom:  leencuh
    lenccu+N+Pl+Gen: [leencui, leˊncui]
    lenccu+N+Pl+Acc:  leencuid
    lenccu+N+Pl+Ill:  lenccuid
    lenccu+N+Pl+Loc:  leencuin
    lenccu+N+Pl+Com:  leˊncuiguin
    lenccu+N+Pl+Abe:  leˊncuittáá

  Noun - lippu:
    lippu+N+Sg+Nom:  lippu
    lippu+N+Sg+Gen:  liipu
    lippu+N+Sg+Ill:  liipun
    lippu+N+Sg+Loc:  liipust
    lippu+N+Sg+Com:  lippuin
    lippu+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊputtáá
    lippu+N+Ess:  lippun
    lippu+N+Pl+Nom:  liipuh
    lippu+N+Pl+Gen: [liipui, liˊpui]
    lippu+N+Pl+Acc:  liipuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Ill:  lippuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Loc:  liipuin
    lippu+N+Pl+Com:  liˊpuiguin
    lippu+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊpuittáá

  Noun - reppu: # ok 
    reppu+N+Sg+Nom:  reppu
    reppu+N+Sg+Gen:  reepu
    reppu+N+Sg+Acc:  reepu
    reppu+N+Sg+Ill:  reepun
    reppu+N+Sg+Loc:  reepust
    reppu+N+Sg+Com:  reppuin
    reppu+N+Sg+Abe:  reˊputtáá
    reppu+N+Ess:  reppun
    reppu+N+Par:  reppud
    reppu+N+Pl+Nom:  reepuh
    reppu+N+Pl+Gen: [reepui, reˊpui]
    reppu+N+Pl+Acc:  reepuid
    reppu+N+Pl+Ill:  reppuid
    reppu+N+Pl+Loc:  reepuin
    reppu+N+Pl+Com:  reˊpuiguin
    reppu+N+Pl+Abe:  reˊpuittáá

  Noun - torttu:
    torttu+N+Sg+Nom:  torttu
    torttu+N+Sg+Gen:  toortu
    torttu+N+Sg+Acc:  toortu
    torttu+N+Sg+Ill:  toortun
    torttu+N+Sg+Loc:  toortust
    torttu+N+Sg+Com:  torttuin
    torttu+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊrtuttáá
    torttu+N+Ess:  torttun
    torttu+N+Par:  torttud
    torttu+N+Pl+Nom:  toortuh
    torttu+N+Pl+Gen: [toortui, toˊrtui]
    torttu+N+Pl+Acc:  toortuid
    torttu+N+Pl+Ill:  torttuid
    torttu+N+Pl+Loc:  toortuin
    torttu+N+Pl+Com:  toˊrtuiguin
    torttu+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊrtuittáá

  Noun - rumbu:
    rumbu+N+Sg+Nom:  rumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruumbun
    rumbu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruumbust
    rumbu+N+Sg+Com:  rumbuin
    rumbu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊmbuttáá
    rumbu+N+Ess:  rumbun
    rumbu+N+Par:  rumbud
    rumbu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruumbuh
    rumbu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruumbui, ruˊmbui]
    rumbu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruumbuid
    rumbu+N+Pl+Ill:  rumbuid
    rumbu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruumbuin
    rumbu+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊmbuiguin
    rumbu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊmbuittáá

  Noun - pumppu:
    pumppu+N+Sg+Nom:  pumppu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Gen:  puumpu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Acc:  puumpu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Ill:  puumpun
    pumppu+N+Sg+Loc:  puumpust
    pumppu+N+Sg+Com:  pumppuin
    pumppu+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊmputtáá
    pumppu+N+Ess:  pumppun
    pumppu+N+Par:  pumppud
    pumppu+N+Pl+Nom:  puumpuh
    pumppu+N+Pl+Gen: [puumpui, puˊmpui]
    pumppu+N+Pl+Acc:  puumpuid
    pumppu+N+Pl+Ill:  pumppuid
    pumppu+N+Pl+Loc:  puumpuin
    pumppu+N+Pl+Com:  puˊmpuiguin
    pumppu+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊmpuittáá

  Noun - ruvdu:
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruuvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruuvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuvdun
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruuvdust
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Com:  ruvduin
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊvduttáá
    ruvdu+N+Ess:  ruvdun
    ruvdu+N+Par:  ruvdud
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruuvduh
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuvdui, ruˊvdui]
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuvduid
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruvduid
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuvduin
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊvduiguin
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊvduittáá

  Noun - vuáisá: # removed from fadda to tavlu
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáiˊsá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáisást
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Com:  vuáiˊsáin
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊisáttáá
    vuáisá+N+Ess:  vuáiˊsán
    vuáisá+N+Par:  vuáiˊsád
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáisáh
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuáisái, vuáˊisái]
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáiˊsáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊisáiguin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊisáittáá
